src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Inari Sámi morphological analyser

This file documents the Inari Sámi morphological analyser. The tags in bold are the ones in use in the analyser.

 **Multichar_Symbols** definitions

## Parts of speech
* **+N +A +Adv +V**
* **+Pron +CS +CC**
* **+Adp +Po +Pr**
* **+Interj +Pcle**
* **+Num** 
* **+ABBR** 
* **+Symbol** = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

### Tags for sub-POS

* **+Prop** - Propernoun
* **+Pers** - Personal Pronoun
* **+Dem** - Demonstrative Pronoun
* **+Interr** - Interrogative Pronoun
* **+Refl** - Reflexive Pronoun
* **+Recipr** - Reciprocal Pronoun
* **+Rel** - Relative Pronoun
* **+Indef** - Indefinitive Pronoun
* **+Coll** - Collective numerals, subtag for +N
* **+Arab** - Arabic numeral, subtag for +Num
* **+Rom** - Roman numeral, subtag for +Num
* **+ACR** - Acronym
* **+Dyn** - Dynamic Acronym
* **+NomAg** 
* **+Ord** 

### Tags for governing abbreviations in preprocessing

* **+Gram/TAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation (it needs an argument)
* **+Gram/NoAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviations that are homonymous   with more frequent words. They should only be considered  abbreviations in the middle of a sentence.
* **+Gram/TNumAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation if the following     constituent is numeric
* **+Gram/NumNoAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviations for which numerals are complements and normal words. The abbreviation usage  the sentence can be considered as true cases.
* **+Gram/TIAbbr**:  Both transitive and intransitive abbreviation
* **+Gram/IAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviation (it takes no argument)
* **+Gram/3syll**: trisyllabic verbs
* **+Span** - used for numerical expressions denoting spans or intervals, like 5-10, 2012-2015, etc  

## Grammatical properties

* **+IV +TV** 
* **+SentInit** 

### Number
* **+Sg +Pl +Du** 

#### Person - number
* **+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3** 
* **+Du1 +Du2 +Du3** 
* **+Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3** 

#### Px
* **+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3** 
* **+PxDu1 +PxDu2 +PxDu3** 
* **+PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3** 

#### Cases
* **+Nom +Gen +Acc** 
* **+Ill +Ine +Ela** 
* **+Com +Ess +Par +Abe** 
* **+Loc** 
* **+Known** mon , till we found a better tag

### Adjectival forms
* **+Comp +Superl** 
* **+Attr** 

### Adverb types 

* **+Spat**    Spatial adverbs
* **+Temp** Temporal adverbs

### Tense - mood
* **+Ind +Pot +Cond +Imprt +ImprtII** 
* **+Prs +Prt** 

### Indefinite verb forms
* **+Pass +Sup** 
* **+Inf +Ger +GerII** 
* **+ConNeg +Neg** 
* **+PrsPrc +PrfPrc** 
* **+VGen +VAbess** 
* **+Actio** 

## Derivation tags

The derivation position tags.

### The tag +Der
All non-positional derivations should be preceded by this tag, to make it possible
to target regular expressions at all derivations in a language-independent way:
just specify +Der|+Der1 .. +Der5 and you are set.

* **+Der** is the tag to put before the other der tags.

### Table for derivation tags

| Pos1 | Pos2     | Pos3  | Pos4  | POS switches (from-to)| Explanation
| ---  | ---      | ---   | ---   | ---                   | ---
| **+Der1** |            |            |      |    | Position tag, required
|            | **+Der2** |            |      |    | Position tag, required
|            |            | **+Der3** |      |    | Position tag, required
|            |            |            | **+Der4** |    | Position tag, required
| **+Der/lasj** |            |            |      | NA | 
| **+Der/d** |            |            |      | VV | 
| **+Der/tt** |            |            |      | VV | - Causative čälittiđ
| **+Der/Caus** |            |            |      | VV | - 3-syll causatives
| **+Der/l** |            |            |      | VV | 
| **+Der/st** |            |            |      | VV | čälistiđ
| **+Der/Car** |            |            |      | NA | * +Der1+Der2 - only combine with Der3 caritive: peljittem
| **+Der/laakan** |            |            |      | AA | * +Der1+Der2 - only combine with Der3
| **+Der/Pass** |            |            |      | VV | -  passive
|            | **+Der/Dimin** |            |      | NN | (was: Der/aš & Der/š)
|            | **+Der/NomAg** |            |      |    | 
|            | **+Der/NomAct** |            |      | VN | Der/NomAct har to realisasjonar, med ulike restriksjonar,
|            | **+Der/sasj** |            |      | NA |           
|            | **+Der/alla** |            |      | VV | 
|            | **+Der/adda** |            |      | VV | 
|            | **+Der/AAdv** |            |      |    | adverb pyeremusávt pyeremusâht
|            | **+Der/taa** |            |      |    | adverb pyeremustáá !This is not the best tag?
|            |            | **+Der/vuota** |      | AN | 
|            |            |            | **+Der/InchL** | VV | 
|            |            |            | **+Der/upmi** | VN | 
|            |            |            | **+Der/mas** | VN | 

### Other derivations

Other/unclassified derivations, can appear in all positions:

* **+Der/ag** neeljičievâg neeljijienâg kuulmâloonjâg neeljičievâg neeljijienâg
* **+Der/ahasas** 85-ahasâš škovlâahasâš
* **+Der/ivvaas** 
* **+Der/vualasas** tutkâmvuálásâš
* **+Der/Superl** 
* **+Der/Comp** 
* **+Ex/N** - This tag is not added in lexc. The POS tag before derivation is converted into this tag when compiling FST for disambiguation.
* **+Ex/A** - This tag is not added in lexc. The POS tag before derivation is converted into this tag when compiling FST for disambiguation.
* **+Ex/V** - This tag is not added in lexc. The POS tag before derivation is converted into this tag when compiling FST for disambiguation.

### Clitics

* **+Qst** question particle
* **+Foc** 
 **+Foc/ba** 
 **+Foc/baa** 
 **+Foc/baan** 
 **+Foc/ban** 
 **+Foc/gan** 
 **+Foc/gas** 
 **+Foc/ge** 
 **+Foc/gen** 
 **+Foc/ges** 
 **+Foc/gin** 
 **+Foc/gis** 
 **+Foc/go** 
 **+Foc/han** 
 **+Foc/kas** 
 **+Foc/kin** 
 **+Foc/kis** 
 **+Foc/nii** 
 **+Foc/pa** 
 **+Foc/sun** 
**+Foc/uv** ... focus particles.

## Error tags

All Err-tags must have a normative form as lemma except Err/Lex

* **+Err/Orth** - substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/Lex** - substandard, not in normative fst, no normative lemma
* **+Err/Hyph** - substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/SpaceCmp** - substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/MissingSpace** - in use in smi lexc

### Usage tags

* **+MWE** - MultiWord Expression, used for abbreviation extraction for preprocess.sh
* **+Use/-PLX** - do not include in Polderland spellers (most likely irrelevant for smn)
* **+Use/-Spell** - do not include in speller (even though the entry is formally correct)
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg** - Recognized, but not suggested in speller 
* **+Use/NGminip** Not for miniparadigm in NDS dicts
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

### Semantic tags to help disambiguation & synt. analysis: (before POS)

* +Sem/Act = Activity
* +Sem/Adr = Webadr
* +Sem/Amount = Amount
* +Sem/Ani = Animate
* +Sem/Aniprod = Animal Product
* +Sem/Body = Bodypart
* +Sem/Body-abstr = siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi, (noe man kan bruke i fysisk aktivitet som en kroppsdel, f.eks. synet, stemmen, etc.)
* +Sem/Build = Building
* +Sem/Build-room = Room in a building, typically place to be
* +Sem/Buildpart = Part of Bulding, like the wall
* +Sem/Cat = Category
* +Sem/Clth = Clothes
* +Sem/Clth-jewl = Jewelery
* +Sem/Clthpart = part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
* +Sem/Ctain = Container
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr = Abstract container like bank account
* +Sem/Ctain-clth = Soft container, like a rucksack
* +Sem/Curr = Currency like dollár, Not Money
* +Sem/Date = Date
* +Sem/Dance = Dance
* +Sem/Dir = Direction like GPS-kursa
* +Sem/Domain = Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
* +Sem/Drink = Drink
* +Sem/Dummytag = Dummytag
* +Sem/Edu = Educational event
* +Sem/Event = Event
* +Sem/Feat = Feature, like Árvu. (noe som man kan ha mye eller lite av, det kan være en skala og som er på en måte karakteriserende. (høyde, vekt, farge, kreativitet etc.)
* +Sem/Feat-phys = Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
* +Sem/Feat-psych = Psychological feauture
* +Sem/Feat-measr = Psychological feauture
* +Sem/Fem = Female name
* +Sem/Food = Food
* +Sem/Food-med = Medicine
* +Sem/Fruit = Fruits, vegetables, seeds, nuts
* +Sem/Furn = Furniture
* +Sem/Game = Game
* +Sem/Geom = Geometrical object
* +Sem/Group = Animal or Human Group
* +Sem/Hum = Human
* +Sem/Hum-abstr = Human abstract
* +Sem/Hum-prof = Human professional
* +Sem/Ideol = Ideology
* +Sem/ID = ID
* +Sem/Lang = Language
* +Sem/Mal = Male name
* +Sem/Mat = Material for producing things
* +Sem/Measr = Measure
* +Sem/Money = Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
* +Sem/Obj = Object
* +Sem/Obj-clo = Cloth
* +Sem/Obj-cogn = Cloth
* +Sem/Obj-el = (Electrical) machine or apparatus
* +Sem/Obj-ling = Object with something written on it
* +Sem/Obj-rope = flexible ropelike object
* +Sem/Obj-surfc = Surface object
* +Sem/Org = Organisation
* +Sem/Part = Feature, oassi, bealli
* Perc = (perception) er noe man kan kjenne i en begrensa periode og som er forårsaka av noe utenifra, f.eks. Mus lea ballu. Mus lea bavččas.
* +Sem/Perc-cogn =
* +Sem/Perc-emo = Emotional perception
* +Sem/Perc-phys = Physical perception
* +Sem/Perc-psych = Psychological perception
* +Sem/Phonenr = Telephone number
* +Sem/Plant = Plant
* +Sem/Plantpart = Plant part
* +Sem/Plc = Place
* +Sem/Plc-abstr = Abstract place
* +Sem/Plc-elevate = Place
* +Sem/Plc-line = Place
* +Sem/Plc-water = Place
* +Sem/Pos = Position (as in social position job)
* +Sem/Process = Process
* +Sem/Prod = Product
* +Sem/Prod-audio = Audio product
* +Sem/Prod-cogn = Cognition product
* +Sem/Prod-ling = Linguistic product
* +Sem/Prod-vis = Visual product
* +Sem/Rel = Relation
* +Sem/Route = Route
* +Sem/Rule = Rule or convention
* +Sem/Semcon = Semantic concept
* +Sem/Sign = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation)
* +Sem/Sport = Sport
* +Sem/State =
* +Sem/State-sick = Illness
* +Sem/Substnc = Substance, like Air and Water
* +Sem/Sur = Surname
* +Sem/Symbol = Symbol
* +Sem/Time = Time
* +Sem/Time-clock = Time clock
* +Sem/Tool = Prototypical tool for repairing things
* +Sem/Tool-catch = Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
* +Sem/Tool-clean = Tool used for cleaning
* +Sem/Tool-it = Tool used in IT
* +Sem/Tool-measr = Tool used for measuring
* +Sem/Tool-music = Music instrument
* +Sem/Tool-write = Writing tool
* +Sem/Txt = Text (girji, lávlla...)
* +Sem/Veh = Vehicle
* +Sem/Wpn = Weapon
* +Sem/Wthr = The Weather or the state of ground
* +Sem/Year - year (i.e. 1000 - 2999), used only for numerals

### semtags to be checked
